Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-618 Injunctions. If it
appears to the commissioner that any person has committed or is about to commit
a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or order of the
commissioner under this part, the commissioner may apply to the circuit court
for an order enjoining the person from violating or continuing to violate this
part or any rule or order and for injunctive relief as the nature of the case
or the interests of the financial institution or the financial institution
holding company or its depositors, beneficiaries, creditors or shareholders may
require. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next